Hawaii statutes.
§607-20 Charitable trusts, special
provisions. (a) Notwithstanding any other provisions, in the case of a
charitable trust, the compensation of the trustees shall be limited to an
amount that is reasonable under the circumstances.

(b) This section shall apply to existing and
new charitable trusts established after January 1, 1999; provided that any
provisions in existing trust agreements regarding trustees' compensation shall
supersede this section. [L 1943, c 149, §§1, 2; RL 1945, §9758; RL 1955, §219-19;
am L 1959, c 169, §2; HRS §607-20; am L 1998, c 310, §2]

Revision Note

"January 1, 1999" substituted for "the
effective date of this Act".

Case Notes

Sums collected from lessees of estate and paid to State for
real property taxes are income. 53 H. 604, 499 P.2d 670 (1972).

Cited: 37 H. 111, 139 (1945).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next